Utah statutes.
53A-15-1007.   Electronic High School diploma.

The Electronic High School may award a diploma to a student that meets any of the following criteria upon the student's completion of high school graduation requirements set by the board:

(1)  a home-schooled student;

(2)  a student who has dropped out of school and whose original high school class has graduated; or

(3)  a student who is identified by the student's resident school district as ineligible for graduation from a traditional high school program for specific reasons.

